Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1808
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of the American Indian Arts and Crafts Sales Act shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1986, LB 275, § 8.